Hawaii statutes.
[§10-35] Funding and refunding bonds;
principal amount. Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount
sufficient to provide funds for the payment of all bonds or indebtedness to be
funded or refunded thereby, and for the payment of all expenses paid or
incurred in connection with the calling, redeeming, retiring, or paying of such
indebtedness or outstanding bonds, and the issuance of such refunding bonds.
The expenses may include the amount necessary for the payment of interest upon
the indebtedness to be funded or the bonds to be refunded to the maturity or
redemption date thereof, the amount necessary for the payment of interest upon
the refunding bonds from the date of delivery thereof to the date upon which
the principal of the outstanding bonds to be refunded will be paid whether at
maturity or pursuant to a call for redemption thereof, or pursuant to agreement
with the holders thereof, plus in any case the amount of the premium, if any,
required to be paid in order to call or retire the bonds to be required. [L
1994, c 283, pt of §2(2)]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next